Hawaii, session 2026, GM1276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that culture, arts, and
history are essential pillars of Hawaii's identity and are vital
to building vibrant, resilient, and connected communities. The
State has long supported these efforts through the state
foundation on culture and the arts, which plays an important
role in promoting the arts and expanding access for residents
statewide.
The legislature further finds that jurisdictions around the
world have advanced innovative, place-based strategies that
integrate culture, arts, and history into planning,
infrastructure, and community development, resulting in stronger
public spaces, increased economic activity, and more dynamic and
inclusive communities.
The legislature also finds that Hawaii can build upon its
existing foundation by expanding its capacity to support
creative community development, foster cross-sector
2026-2567 SB3007 GDI SMA.docx 1
lillinilHiirilBEIflBlllIQIil

Page 2 3007
S.B. NO.
S.D.2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
collaboration, and advance projects that meaningfully integrate
culture and the arts into the fabric of everyday life.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish the
office of community culture, arts, and innovation as a sister
entity to the state foundation on culture and the arts to
broaden and strengthen the State's creative portfolio. The
office shall identify and advance best practices; support state
agencies and community partners in implementing innovative,
place-based strategies; and prioritize projects that enhance
public spaces, strengthen community connections, and improve
quality of life across the State.
The office shall also establish a community and cultural
partnership program to serve as a resource for communities
statewide. The program shall support efforts that preserve and
elevate cultural and historical assets, stimulate social and
economic activity, and catalyze positive, community-driven
17- change, with projects serving as scalable models for replication
in other communities, as appropriate.
SECTION 2. Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and
to read as follows:
2026-2567 SB3007 CDl SMA.docx
inHiiniHiiiiiniDiH

Page 3 3007
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
"FART OFFICE OF COMMUNITY CULTURE, ARTS, ARD INNOVATION
§201-A Definitions. As used in. this part:
"Executive director" means the executive director of the
office of community culture, arts, and innovation, appointed
pursuant to section 201-B{b).
"Office" means the office of community culture, arts, and
innovation established pursuant to section 201-B.
§201-B Office of community culture, arts, and innovation;
established; executive director. (a) There is established an
office of community culture, arts, and innovation within the
department of business, economic development, and tourism for
administrative purposes only.
(b) The office shall be headed by an executive director
who shall be appointed by the governor without regard to
chapter 76. Notwithstanding section 76-16(b) (17), the exemption
from chapter 76 under this subsection shall not expire.
(c) The executive director may employ staff for the office
without regard to chapters 76 and 89; provided that the staff
shall be members of the employees’ retirement system and shall
be eligible to receive the benefits of any employee benefit
program generally applicable to officers and employees of the
2026-2567 SB30O7 GDI SMA.docx
niDUMimiiiiiiiHiiiiiiiii

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
State. Notwithstanding section 76-16(b) (17), the exemption from
chapter 76 under this subsection shall not expire.
(d) Department heads may temporarily assign additional
employees from existing positions within their departments to
the office; provided that the employees shall represent their
respective department's needs, assist other departments, or
otherwise support the needs of the office during the course of
their assignment with the office.
(e) The office may provide grants and contract for the
provision of programs and services to perform its functions and
duties pursuant to section 201-C.
§201-C Office of community culture, arts, and innovation;
functions and duties. The office shall:
(1) Execute projects and programs related to community
improvement as directed by the governor and
legislature;
(2) Support and assist other state departments and
agencies with creative and innovative improvements to
their projects, programs, and endeavors to add value
to communities;
2026-2567 SB3007 CDl SMA.docx
livimHiiiiiiiiniiHHiiMi

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) Develop creative and innovative projects, programs,
and endeavors and pilot new approaches to add value to
communities, their culture, and quality of life;
(4) Identify creative and innovative best practices used
by other jurisdictions, assess their value to the
State, and innovate accordingly;
(5) Ensure communication with the state foundation on
culture and the arts regarding the office's functions
and duties for consistency and better planning for the
State; and
(6) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 for the
purposes of this part.
§201-D Annual repost. The office shall submit an annual
report summarizing its activities during the preceding year to
the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening
of each regular session. The report shall include:
(1) Creative and innovative strategies proposed or
employed by other jurisdictions that the office has
identified that may have potential benefit for
communities in the State;
2026-2567 SB3007 CDl SMA.docx 5

Page 6 S.B. NO.
3^'2
• h.D. 1
C.D. 1
(2) Funds received and expended for the activities of the
office from federal, state, private, and philanthropic
sources;
(3) The office's programs and activities throughout the
year ;
(4) Plans and direction for the coming year; and
(5) Any other findings and recommendations, including any
proposed legislation.
§201-E Community and cultural partnership program;
established. (a) In addition to other duties, the office shall
establish a community and cultural partnership program focused
on improving communities. The program shall serve as a
community resource to enhance historical culture, stimulate
social and economic activity, create positive change in the
community, and serve as a template for improvements in other
communities, as may be appropriate.
(b) The office may contract with one or more entities to
administer the community and cultural partnership program and
complete the actions required by subsection (c).
(c) The program shall endeavor to:
2026-2567 SB3007 GDI SMA.docx 6

Page 7
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) Identify and organize community stakeholders and other
community-based organizations that may contribute to
the community and cultural partnership program;
(2) Engage the community to develop improvements that
exhibit the area's history from its origins to the
present day;
(3) Assess the physical, social, and economic conditions
of properties and infrastructure in the area;
(4) Coordinate with stakeholders to provide for
preservation, adaptive reuse, and mixed-use diversity
and assist with design and permitting information to
help property owners, business owners, and developers
who are considering property improvements to best
reflect the cultural narrative and historical context
of the area;
(5) Organize culture and arts and improvement projects to
improve and expand public spaces and enhance streets,
infrastructure, facades, and vacant storefronts;
(6) Organize community culture and arts events, including
the closures of streets for events and multi-use
purposes that can enhance community life by providing
2026-2567 SB3007 GDI SMA.docx
iiiiiniiiiniiiiiniiiiiiiiii

Page 8 S.B. NO. “’2
C.D. 1
safe and inclusive opportunities for recreation,
active transportation, and cultural engagement;
(7) Help facilitate the establishment of a business
improvement district, or similar organization, and
related community services;
(8) Seek additional funding to improve the community and
help enhance a geographically defined area that
actively preserves, showcases, and evolves the
cultural, historical, and artistic identity of a
community through ongoing cultural practices, local
businesses, public spaces, and programming, in a
manner that is community-driven, supports economic
vitality, and provides authentic, place-based
experiences for residents and visitors;
(9) Draft a statewide strategic economic and physical
revitalization design implementation plan with
proposed projects, starting with the Honolulu
Chinatown area;
(10) Work with appropriate agencies and stakeholders to
better design and integrate active, safe, and
protected multi-modal pedestrian, bicycle, and public
2026-2567 SB3007 CDl SMA.docx
iiniiiiiiHiiiniiiBiiiiiii

Page 9
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
transit through the area, including to any nearby
transit hubs or rail stations; and
(11) Identify and develop other innovative projects,
prograrnming, or improvements to enhance the
community."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $300,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
establishment of the office of community culture, arts, and
innovation, including for the following purposes:
(1) The establishment of one full-time equivalent
(1.0 FTE) executive director position;
(2) The establishment of one full-time equivalent
(1.0 FTE) specialist position; and
(3) Other expenses for the purposes of this Act.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of
this Act.
SECTION 4. In codifying the new sections added by
section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute
2026-2567 SB3007 CDl SMA.docx 9
iiRiiiiiiniiiiHiininiBiii

Page 10
S.B. NO. S?*
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating
the new sections in this Act.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2567 SB3007 CDl SMA.docx 10
■oHniiHinimiiiiiiiiiiiii

3007
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 3007, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
212-26

SB No. 3007, SD 2, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives